Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB611.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "hazardous substance" in section 103 of the act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act, is amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Hazardous substance."123456789101112131415161718192021 (1) Any element, compound or material which is:(i) Designated as a hazardous waste under the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, and the regulations promulgated thereto.(ii) Defined or designated as a hazardous substance pursuant to the Federal Superfund Act.(iii) Contaminated with a hazardous substance to the degree that its release or threatened release poses a substantial threat to the public health and safety or the environment as determined by the department.(iv) Determined to be substantially harmful to public health and safety or the environment based on a standardized and uniformly applied department testing procedure and listed in regulations proposed by the department and promulgated by the Environmental Quality Board.(1.1) A chemical substance not included under paragraph (1) that is:(i) perfluorooctanoic acid;(ii) perfluorooctanesulfonic acid;(iii) perfluorohexanesulfonic acid;(iv) perfluorononanoic acid;(v) determined by the department to be the equivalent of a compound under paragraph (1); or(vi) designated by executive order of the Governor as a chemical substance or chemical compound that poses a threat to public health and safety or the environment.(2) The term does not include petroleum or petroleum products, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, which are not otherwise specifically listed or designated as a 20250SB0611PN0462 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hazardous substance under paragraph (1); natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquified natural gas or synthetic gas usable for fuel or mixtures of natural gas and synthetic gas usable for fuel; or an element, substance, compound or mixture from a coal mining operation under the jurisdiction of the department or from a site eligible for funding under Title IV of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (Public Law 95-87, 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.). The term shall also not include the following wastes generated primarily from the combustion of coal or other fossil fuels for the production of electricity: slag waste; flue gas emission control waste; and fly ash waste and bottom ash waste which is disposed of or beneficially used in accordance with the Solid Waste Management Act and the regulations promulgated thereto or which has been disposed of under a valid permit issued pursuant to any other environmental statute.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0611PN0462 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718